Nebraska, session 109, LB1097.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1097 LB1097
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the State and Political Subdivisions Sexual Abuse Liability Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature hereby declares that the state, state
agencies, and political subdivisions shall be liable in a similar manner
and to a similar extent as a private individual or entity under like
circumstances for tort claims arising out of sexual abuse of children and
individuals with developmental disabilities.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the State and Political Subdivisions Sexual
Abuse Liability Act:
(1) Child sexual abuse means conduct that amounts to a violation of
section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01;
(2) Developmental disability has the same meaning as in section
71-1107;
(3)(a) Employee, with reference to a political subdivision, has the
same meaning as in section 13-903.
(b) Employee, with reference to a state agency, has the same meaning
as in section 81-8,210;
(4) Political subdivision has the same meaning as in section 13-903;
(5) Sexual abuse means conduct that amounts to a violation of
section 28-319 or 28-320, other than a misdemeanor violation of section
28-320;
(6) State agency has the same meaning as in section 81-8,210; and
(7) Tort claim means any claim against a political subdivision or
state agency for money only on account of personal injury or death,
caused by the negligent or wrongful act or omission of any official or
employee of the political subdivision or state agency, while acting
within the scope of his or her office or employment, under circumstances
in which the political subdivision or state agency, if a private person,
would be liable to the claimant for such injury or death.
Sec. 4. (1) An individual who is a victim of child sexual abuse may
bring a tort claim arising from such child sexual abuse against a
-2-

LB1097 LB1097
2026 2026
political subdivision or a state agency.
(2) An individual with a developmental disability who is a victim of
sexual abuse may bring a tort claim arising from such sexual abuse
against a political subdivision or a state agency.
Sec. 5. The State and Political Subdivisions Sexual Abuse Liability
Act constitutes a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state and all
political subdivisions, and an action under the act is not subject to the
State Tort Claims Act or the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act or
the limitations or requirements in such acts, including, but not limited
to, limits on recoverable damages, limits on the availability of a jury
trial, notice requirements, and statutes of limitations.
Sec. 6. (1) Criminal prosecution of any sexual abuse is not
required to maintain a civil action under the State and Political
Subdivisions Sexual Abuse Liability Act.
(2) The remedy provided in the State and Political Subdivisions
Sexual Abuse Liability Act is cumulative and shall be in addition to any
other remedies provided by law.
(3) No writ of execution shall issue against the state, a state
agency, or a political subdivision for a tort claim under the State and
Political Subdivisions Sexual Abuse Liability Act.
Sec. 7. Section 13-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-903 For purposes of the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act
and sections 16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Political subdivision includes shall include villages, cities of
all classes, counties, school districts, learning communities, public
power districts, and all other units of local government, including
entities created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint
Public Agency Act. Political subdivision shall not be construed to
include any contractor with a political subdivision;
-3-

LB1097 LB1097
2026 2026
(2) Governing body means shall mean the village board of a village,
the city council of a city, the board of commissioners or board of
supervisors of a county, the board of directors of a public power
district, the governing board or other governing body of an entity
created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint Public Agency
Act, and any duly elected or appointed body holding the power and
authority to determine the appropriations and expenditures of any other
unit of local government;
(3) Employee of a political subdivision means shall mean any one or
more officers or employees of the political subdivision or any agency of
the subdivision and shall include members of the governing body, duly
appointed members of boards or commissions when they are acting in their
official capacity, volunteer firefighters, and volunteer rescue squad
personnel. Employee shall not be construed to include any contractor with
a political subdivision; and
(4)(a) (4) Tort claim means shall mean any claim against a political
subdivision for money only on account of damage to or loss of property or
on account of personal injury or death, caused by the negligent or
wrongful act or omission of any employee of the political subdivision,
while acting within the scope of his or her office or employment, under
circumstances in which the political subdivision, if a private person,
would be liable to the claimant for such damage, loss, injury, or death
but shall not include any claim accruing before January 1, 1970.
(b) Tort claim does not include an action under the State and
Political Subdivisions Sexual Abuse Liability Act.
Sec. 8. Section 25-228, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
25-228 (1) For purposes of this section, the terms child sexual
abuse, developmental disability, and sexual abuse have the same meanings
as in section 2 of this act. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of
law:
-4-

LB1097 LB1097
2026 2026
(2)(a) (a) There shall not be any time limitation for an action
against the individual or individuals directly causing an injury or
injuries suffered by a plaintiff when the plaintiff was a victim of child
sexual abuse a violation of section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01 if such abuse
violation occurred (i) on or after August 24, 2017, or (ii) prior to
August 24, 2017, if such action was not previously time barred. ; and
(b) An action against any person or entity other than the individual
directly causing an injury or injuries suffered by a plaintiff when the
plaintiff was a victim of child sexual abuse, including an action under
the State and Political Subdivisions Sexual Abuse Liability Act, a
violation of section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01 may only be brought within
twelve years after the plaintiff's twenty-first birthday.
(3) There shall not be any time limitation for an action against the
individual or individuals directly causing an injury or injuries suffered
by a plaintiff when the plaintiff was an individual with a developmental
disability and was a victim of sexual abuse, if such abuse occurred (i)
on or after the effective date of this act, or (ii) prior to the
effective date of this act, if such action was not previously time
barred.
(b) An action against any person or entity other than the individual
directly causing an injury or injuries suffered by a plaintiff when the
plaintiff was an individual with a developmental disability and was a
victim of sexual abuse, including an action under the State and Political
Subdivisions Sexual Abuse Liability Act, may only be brought within the
later of:
(i) Four years after the abuse; or
(ii) Twelve years after the plaintiff's twenty-first birthday.
(4) (2) Criminal prosecution of a defendant under section 28-319.01
or 28-320.01 is not required to maintain a civil action described in this
section for violation of such sections.
Sec. 9. Section 81-8,210, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-5-

LB1097 LB1097
2026 2026
amended to read:
81-8,210 For purposes of the State Tort Claims Act:
(1) State agency includes all departments, agencies, boards,
bureaus, and commissions of the State of Nebraska and corporations the
primary function of which is to act as, and while acting as,
instrumentalities or agencies of the State of Nebraska but shall not
include corporations that are essentially private corporations or
entities created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint
Public Agency Act. State agency does not include any contractor with the
State of Nebraska;
(2) State Claims Board means the board created by section 81-8,220;
(3) Employee of the state means any one or more officers or
employees of the state or any state agency and shall include duly
appointed members of boards or commissions when they are acting in their
official capacity. State employee does not include any employee of an
entity created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint
Public Agency Act or any contractor with the State of Nebraska;
(4)(a) (4) Tort claim means any claim against the State of Nebraska
for money only on account of damage to or loss of property or on account
of personal injury or death caused by the negligent or wrongful act or
omission of any employee of the state, while acting within the scope of
his or her office or employment, under circumstances in which the state,
if a private person, would be liable to the claimant for such damage,
loss, injury, or death but does not include any claim accruing before
January 1, 1970, any claim against an employee of the state for money
only on account of damage to or loss of property or on account of
personal injury or death caused by the negligent or wrongful act or
omission of the employee while acting within the scope of his or her
employment occurring on or after August 25, 1989, and any claim allowed
under the Nebraska Claims for Wrongful Conviction and Imprisonment Act. ;
(b) Tort claim does not include an action under the State and
-6-

LB1097 LB1097
2026 2026
Political Subdivisions Sexual Abuse Liability Act;
(5) Award means any amount determined by the Risk Manager or State
Claims Board to be payable to a claimant under section 81-8,211 or the
amount of any compromise or settlement under section 81-8,218; and
(6) Risk Manager means the Risk Manager appointed under section
81-8,239.01.
Sec. 10. Original sections 13-903 and 81-8,210, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 25-228, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-